California statutes. Education Code
(b) In adopting the necessary rules and regulations establishing the requirements for the preparation of special education specialties, the commission shall ensure that teachers have sufficient knowledge of subject matter that is the core of the California public school curriculum and experience with nonspecial education pupils
 to the extent deemed appropriate by the commission.

(c) All administrative regulations governing special education specialists credentials that were in effect on December 31, 1989, shall continue to be operative until the commission amends or repeals those regulations to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 663, Sec. 16.   (AB 320)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44265.1.

(a) No later than January 1, 2028, the commission shall ensure that its standards of program quality and effectiveness for the preparation of candidates for the reading and literacy leadership specialist credential and the reading and literacy added authorization, and the teaching performance expectations for the preparation of candidates for the reading and literacy leadership specialist credential and the reading and literacy added authorization include preparation on how to deliver instruction and support teachers to deliver instruction through effective means for teaching literacy, aligned to all of the following:

(1) The English Language Arts/English Language Development (ELA/ELD)
 Framework, including instruction to meet the varied language development needs of English learners.

(2) Evidence-based means of teaching foundational reading skills, which shall include explicit and systematic instruction in print concepts, phonological awareness, phonics and word recognition, and fluency to all pupils, and attending to oral and written language development, vocabulary and background knowledge, and comprehension, including tiered supports for pupils
 with reading difficulties, English learners, and pupils with exceptional needs.

(3) The program guidelines for dyslexia developed pursuant to Section 56335.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that candidates for the reading and literacy leadership specialist credential and the reading and literacy added authorization are prepared to deliver instruction and support teachers to deliver instruction through effective means for teaching literacy in programs in which English learner pupils
 are being instructed in their primary languages.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 471, Sec. 1.   (AB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44265.2.

(a) A program sponsor may offer comparability and equivalency to a special education credentialholder seeking to add a special education authorization to his or her credential. The following are guidelines for offering comparability and equivalency, subject to criteria and guidelines issued by the commission:

(1) Decisions regarding comparability are at the discretion of the program sponsor.

(2) A program sponsor has a broad range of
 possible data that may be considered as evidence for comparability.

(3) For a candidate simultaneously pursuing a degree in addition to earning a credential, a program sponsor may use its own institutional process and procedure for course credit evaluations.

(b) Evidence used to verify competency may include the following, subject to criteria and guidelines issued by the commission:

(1) Examination results.

(2) A portfolio.

(3) A performance narrative.

(4) Field experience.

(5) Video.

(6) Transcripts.

(7) Prior learning assessment.

(8) A review board process.

(c) A program sponsor may use the following to evaluate evidence for comparability presented by a candidate, subject to criteria and guidelines issued by the commission:

(1) Whether the information is based on current, adopted California credential standards, as appropriate to the authorization sought.

(2) Whether a written agreement between the candidate and program sponsor is evidence based, as appropriate to the authorization
 sought.

(3) Whether the information is aligned with the California Standards for the Teaching Profession.

(d) Flexible enrollment may be considered for a candidate who needs minimal work to complete a credential program. A program sponsor may explore alternatives for candidate enrollment in the program, including, but not limited to, visitor status, concurrent enrollment, open university, county or district programs, university extension programs, and professional development activities.

(e) A program sponsor may take advantage of frequent collaborations to formalize a written agreement concerning comparability of coursework or fieldwork. The agreement may be created to meet the needs of the individual program or the individual
 candidate.

(f) A candidate may be granted recognition and credit for his or her life and learning experience through a prior learning assessment in which the candidate has the opportunity to demonstrate how his or her experience and learning are comparable to the commission program standard.

(g) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Equivalency” means the determination, through an evaluation process, that a set of knowledge, skills, and abilities required by a commission program standard has been met through coursework, fieldwork, or prior learning experience.

(2) “Comparability” means the determination that a candidate has
 demonstrated the essence of a set of knowledge, skills, and abilities required by a commission program standard through another route.

(3) “Prior learning assessment” means a process through which a person develops a portfolio of life experiences, training, or preparation experience that establishes the basis for meeting the commission program standard.

(4) “Program sponsor” means a university-based or local educational agency-based program approved by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 717, Sec. 1.   (SB 368)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

44265.3.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2007, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall issue the following credentials:

(1) A preliminary credential in speech-language pathology, to an individual who has been recommended by a commission-accredited program sponsor and who holds or has been recommended for a master’s degree in speech-language pathology from a program accredited by the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association’s Council on Academic Accreditation. The preliminary credential shall be valid for a period of two years.

(2) A professional clear credential in speech-language pathology to an individual who satisfies all of the following criteria:

(A) The individual holds a master’s degree in speech-language pathology from a program accredited by the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association’s Council on Academic Accreditation, or an equivalent degree or academic program, as determined by the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association.

(B) The individual has achieved a passing score, as determined by the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association’s certification requirements on the Educational Testing Service’s national teachers’ Praxis series written test in speech-language pathology or a successor exam.

(C) The individual has completed a mentored practical experience period, in the form of a 36-week, full-time mentored clinical experience, or an equivalent supervised practicum, as deemed by the commission.

(D) The individual satisfies other typical commission credentialing processing requirements, including, but not limited to, forms, fees, and fingerprint clearances.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to align the state credentialing requirements for personnel standards for California speech-language pathologists with standards for Medi-Cal local educational agency reimbursement, in order to ensure continued funding for the Local Education Agency (LEA) Medi-Cal Billing Option Program.

(c) A credential issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing on or before January 1, 2007, authorizing speech, language, and hearing services, shall continue to be valid, subject to commission renewal requirements.

(d) Upon renewal of a credential initially issued on or before January 1, 2007, the credentialholder shall have the option of renewing the credential under the standards applicable prior to January 1, 2007, or to update the credential to satisfy the requirements of subdivision (a). At any time after January 1, 2007, the credentialholder may update his or her credential, upon submission of an application and fee, and verification of requirements met in accordance with subdivision (a).

(e) To the extent allowable, as determined by the federal government, services provided by an individual with a credential for speech-language pathology, as specified in this section, shall be billable through the LEA Medi-Cal Billing Option Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 581, Sec. 1.   Effective September 28, 2006.   Operative, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 581, on date the Attorney General issues an opinion of a specified nature.)
-------------------------------------------

44265.5.

(a) Pupils who are visually impaired shall be taught by teachers whose professional preparation and credential authorization are specific to that impairment.

(b) Pupils who are deaf or hard of hearing shall be taught by teachers whose professional preparation and credential authorization are specific to that impairment.

(c) Pupils who are orthopedically impaired shall be taught by teachers whose professional preparation and credential authorization are specific to that impairment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1288, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44265.6.

(a) Upon the request of an employing school district, county office of education, or state special school, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall determine specific requirements for and issue a one-year specialist instruction emergency permit, solely for the purpose of instructing deaf or hard-of-hearing pupils, to a prelingually deaf candidate upon medical or other appropriate professional verifications.

(b) The applicant is exempted from the requirements in Section 44252 and subdivision (b) of Section 44830.

(c) “Prelingually deaf” means, for purposes of this section, having suffered a hearing loss before three years of age that prevents the processing of linguistic information through
 hearing, with or without amplification.

(d) The emergency specialist instruction permit issued under this section authorizes the holder to teach deaf and hard-of-hearing pupils who are enrolled in state special schools or in special classes for pupils who are deaf or hard of hearing.

(e) A one-year specialist instruction emergency permit issued pursuant to subdivision (a) may be reissued at the request of the employing school district, county office of education, or state special school in accordance with criteria determined by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 34.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

44265.8.

(a) Upon the recommendation of a preliminary credential preparation program sponsor approved by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, the commission shall issue a two-year nonrenewable preliminary teaching credential or preliminary services credential to a candidate who is prelingually deaf and meets all of the requirements in law for the full, pertinent five-year teaching or services credential pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 44251, except that the candidate is exempt from compliance with the state basic skills proficiency testing requirements in Section 44252 and subdivision (b) of Section 44830.

(b) A credential issued under this section authorizes the holder to teach or provide services,
 as authorized by the credential, only to deaf and
 hard-of-hearing pupils who are enrolled in state special schools or in special classes for pupils who are deaf or hard of hearing.

(c) For purposes of this section “prelingually deaf” means a person who suffered hearing loss before three years of age, which prevents the processing of linguistic information through hearing, with or without amplification, if the condition is verified through medical or other appropriate professional means.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 94, Sec. 5.   (AB 1709)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

44265.9.

(a) The Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall develop criteria to verify the proficiency of a holder of a credential issued under Section 44265.8 in performing the essential functions of his or her position.

(b) The school district, county office of education, or state special school that employs a holder of a credential issued under Section 42265.8 shall appoint a three-person panel to verify proficiency using the criteria the commission develops for this purpose. The panel shall report its findings to the employing school
 district, county office of education, or state special school, which may adopt those findings.

(c) The panel appointed pursuant to subdivision (b) shall consist of the following:

(1) A school administrator who is selected by school administrators of the employing school district, county office of education, or state special school.

(2) An individual who is the parent of a deaf or hard-of-hearing pupil and who is selected by a school-related parent group.

(3) A teacher or school services provider who holds a credential to teach or service deaf or
 hard-of-hearing
 pupils and who is selected by teachers at the employing school.

(d) The employing school district, county office of education, or state special school shall ensure that the panel completes the verification of proficiency within two years after the issuance of the credential issued under Section 44265.8.

(e) Upon verification of proficiency, as documented by the employing school district, county office of education, or state special school, the commission shall issue a credential for the remainder of the preliminary period pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 44251 that is limited to providing the instruction authorized by the credential to deaf and hard-of-hearing
 pupils enrolled in state special schools or in special classes, or a services credential for the remainder of the preliminary period that is limited to the provision of services authorized by the credential for deaf and hard-of-hearing pupils enrolled in state special schools or in special classes.

(f) Upon meeting the requirements for a professional clear teaching or services credential, the applicant may apply through their commission-approved professional clear program sponsor for a professional clear credential that is limited to providing the instruction or service authorized by the credential to deaf and
 hard-of-hearing pupils enrolled in state special schools or in special classes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 94, Sec. 6.   (AB 1709)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

44266.

(a) The minimum requirements for the services credential with a specialization in pupil personnel services are a baccalaureate degree or higher degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education, a fifth year of study, and any specialized and professional preparation that the commission shall require, including (1) completion of a commission-approved program of supervised field experience that includes direct classroom contact, jointly sponsored by a school district and a college or university or (2) a program of professional preparation pursuant to subdivision (d).

(b) The services credential with a specialization in pupil personnel services shall authorize
 the holder to perform, at all grade levels, the pupil personnel service approved by the commission as designated on the credential, which may include, but need not be limited to, school counseling, school psychology, child welfare and attendance services, and school social work.

(c) The commission shall continue to issue credentials with a specialization in pupil personnel services under the law as it read on December 31, 1986, for a time period of two years from the effective date of regulations adopted for the issuance of certificates under the new program required by this section, to any candidate in the process of obtaining a services credential with a specialization in pupil personnel services through a previously approved program of study.

(d) (1) For a services credential with a specialization in pupil personnel services, the commission may approve a program of professional preparation offered by a local educational agency if the program of professional preparation meets standards of program quality and effectiveness that have been adopted by the commission.

(2) For a services credential with a specialization in pupil personnel services in any area other than the area of child welfare and attendance, a program of professional preparation approved pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be in partnership with a regionally accredited institution of higher education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 375, Sec. 2.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44266.5.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, the commission shall issue a preliminary professional services credential with a specialization in pupil personnel services to an out-of-state prepared applicant who meets all of the following requirements:

(A) Possesses a baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education.

(B) Has earned a valid corresponding pupil personnel services credential specialization in school counseling, school social work, or school psychology, based upon an out-of-state preparation program.

(C) Has successfully completed a criminal background check conducted under Sections 44339, 44340, and 44341 for credentialing purposes.

(2) A preliminary professional services credential with a specialization in pupil personnel services issued pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be (A) valid for a period of two years and (B) eligible for renewal for a period of no more than two years so long as the credentialholder demonstrates satisfactory progress, as determined by the local educational agency that employs the credentialholder pursuant to the local educational agency’s established criteria.

(b) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 375, Sec. 3.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44267.

The minimum requirements for a services credential with a specialization in health are:

(a) Five years, or its equivalent, of college or university education, or five years of professional preparation approved by the commission.

(b) Possession of a valid license, certificate, or registration, appropriate to the health service to be designated, issued by the California agency authorized by law to license, certificate, or register persons to practice that health service in California.

(c) Such additional requirements as may be prescribed by the commission.

The services credential with a specialization in health shall authorize the holder to perform, at all grade levels, the health service approved by the commission as designated on the credential. Services as an audiometrist, occupational therapist, or physical therapist are not deemed health services within the meaning of this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44267.5.

(a) The minimum requirements for a services credential with a specialization in health for a school nurse are all of the following:

(1) A baccalaureate or higher degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education.

(2) A valid California license as a registered nurse.

(3) One year of coursework beyond the baccalaureate degree in a program approved by the commission.

(b) The period for which a services credential with a specialization in health for a
 school nurse is valid shall be as follows:

(1) For a preliminary credential, pending completion of the one year of coursework beyond the baccalaureate degree in a program approved by the commission, five years.

(2) For the professional credential, after completion of requirements specified by the commission, five years.

(c) The services credential with a specialization in health for a school nurse shall authorize the holder to perform, in grades 12 and below, the health services approved by the commission and designated on the credential.

(d) The holder of a services credential with a specialization in health for a school nurse who also completes the
 requirements for a special class authorization in health in a program that is approved by the commission is authorized to teach classes on health in preschool, kindergarten, grades 1 to 12, inclusive, and classes organized primarily for adults.

(e) For the purposes of the requirement in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the commission may approve a program offered by a local educational agency, which had 40,000 or more pupils enrolled during the 2019–20 school year, for one year of coursework beyond the baccalaureate degree. The commission shall apply the standards for approval of a program of professional preparation offered by a postsecondary educational institution to
 a program of professional preparation offered by a local educational agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 668, Sec. 1.   (AB 815)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44268.

The minimum requirements for a services credential in a specialization in clinical or rehabilitative services are:

(a) A baccalaureate degree or higher degree from an institution approved by the commission.

(b) A fifth year, or its equivalent, of college or university education.

(c) Such specialized and professional preparation as the commission may require.

The services credential with a specialization in clinical or rehabilitative services shall authorize the holder to perform, at all grade levels, the service approved by the commission as designated on the credential. Clinical or rehabilitative services which may be designated by the commission include, but need not be limited to, speech, language, and hearing services.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44269.

The commission may issue a services credential authorizing service as a library media teacher upon completion of specialized preparation as required by the commission.

The standards for these credentials are a baccalaureate degree or higher degree from an institution approved by the commission, a valid teaching credential, and specialized and professional preparation as the commission may require.

Whenever the term “librarian” or “library media teacher” is used in this article, it shall be deemed to refer to “teacher librarian.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 730, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

44270.

(a) The minimum requirements for the preliminary services credential with a specialization in administrative services are all of the following:

(1) Possession of one of the following:

(A) A valid teaching credential requiring the possession of a baccalaureate degree and a professional preparation program including student teaching.

(B) A valid designated subjects career technical education, adult education, or special subjects teaching credential, as specified in Section 44260, 44260.1, 44260.2, 44260.3, or 44260.4, provided the candidate also possesses a baccalaureate degree.

(C) A valid services credential with a specialization in pupil personnel, health, or clinical or rehabilitative services, as specified in Section 44266, 44267, 44267.5, or 44268, or a valid services credential authorizing service as a teacher librarian, as specified in Section 44269.

(D) (i) A valid license to practice occupational therapy issued by the California Board of Occupational Therapy or a valid license to practice physical therapy issued by the Physical Therapy Board of California.

(ii) A preliminary administrative services credential issued to an individual based, in part, on clause (i) shall not authorize the supervision or evaluation of teachers unless the employing local educational agency determines that the individual possesses additional
 educational or job experience, leadership training, or an advanced degree that qualifies the individual for the responsibilities of a school administrator.

(E) A valid credential issued under the laws, rules, and regulations in effect on or before December 31, 1971, which authorizes the same areas as in subparagraphs (B) and (C).

(2) (A) Completion of a minimum of
 five years of one or more of the following:

(i) Successful, full-time classroom teaching experience in the public schools, including, but not limited to, service in state- or county-operated schools, or in regionally accredited private schools of equivalent status.

(ii) Successful, full-time experience in the fields of pupil personnel, health, clinical or rehabilitative, or librarian services.

(iii) Successful, full-time experience as a school-based occupational therapist or physical therapist.

(B) A local educational agency may request a waiver of up to two years of the experience required pursuant to subparagraph (A) for a candidate who (i) completes an administrative services program approved by the commission, (ii) holds an appropriate clear or life prerequisite credential or license, and (iii) has been offered employment in an administrative position by the local educational agency.

(3) Completion of one of the following:

(A) An
 entry-level program of specialized and professional preparation in administrative services approved by the
 commission.

(B) (i) A one-year internship in a program of supervised training in administrative services that is provided by a school district, county office of education, or regionally accredited institution of higher education and that is approved by the commission as satisfying the requirements for the preliminary services credential with a specialization in administrative services.

(ii) The commission shall examine its preservice, professional development, and supervision requirements for the internship programs identified in clause (i) when the commission next considers administrative services credential pathways.

(4) Current employment in an administrative position after completion of professional preparation as defined in paragraph (3), whether full or part time, in a public school or regionally accredited private school of equivalent status. The commission shall encourage school districts to consider the recency of preparation or professional growth in school administration as one of the criteria for employment.

(b) The preliminary administrative services credential shall be valid for a period of five years from the date of initial employment in an administrative
 position, whether full or part time, and shall not be renewable.

(c) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 629, Sec. 1.5.   (AB 1009)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44270.1.

(a) The minimum requirements for the professional services credential with a specialization in administrative services are all of the following:

(1) Possession of a valid preliminary administrative services credential, as specified in Section 44270.

(2) A minimum of two years of successful experience in a full-time administrative position in a public school or private school of equivalent status, while holding the preliminary administrative services credential, as attested by the employing school district or agency, including, but not limited to, the department, in the case of state school administrators, and county offices of education, in the case of county school administrators.

(3) Completion of a commission-approved program of advanced preparation. Each candidate, in consultation with employing school district personnel and university personnel, shall develop an individualized program of professional development activities for this advanced preparation program based upon individual needs. Each individualized program will include university coursework and may include, nonuniversity activities or advanced administrative field experiences. The commission shall adopt standards and criteria for the university programs of advanced preparation and nonuniversity activities.

(b) The commission may, at the request of a credential candidate, grant a waiver, pursuant to subdivision (m) of Section 44225, of the requirement of university coursework upon its finding that the candidate, in consultation with personnel of the employing school district and personnel of the university, is not able to develop an individualized program of professional development for the advanced preparation program that meets the individual needs of the candidates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 517, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

44270.2.

The services credential with a specialization in administrative services shall authorize the holder to perform administrative services at all grade levels.

Any person who administers a pupil personnel program shall hold a services credential with a pupil personnel or administrative specialization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 378, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

44270.3.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, the commission shall issue a preliminary services credential with a specialization in administrative services to an out-of-state trained administrator who meets all of the following requirements:

(a) Possesses a baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education.

(b) Completed a teacher preparation program at a regionally accredited institution of higher education, was issued an elementary, secondary, or special education teaching credential based upon that program, and served on that credential for at least three years.

(c) Completed an
 administrator preparation program at a regionally accredited institution of higher education and was issued, or qualified for, an administrative services credential based upon that program.

(d) Submitted fingerprint cards and met the requirements of California for teacher fitness pursuant to Sections 44339, 44340, and 44341.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 33.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

44270.4.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, the commission shall issue a professional services credential with a specialization in administrative services to an out-of-state trained administrator who meets all of the following requirements:

(a) Possesses a baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education.

(b) Successfully passed the basic skills proficiency test administered pursuant to Section 44252.5.

(c) Completed a teacher preparation program at a regionally accredited institution of higher education, was issued an elementary, secondary, or special education teaching credential based upon that program, and served on that credential for at least three years.

(d) Completed an administrator preparation program at a regionally accredited institution of higher education and was issued an administrative services credential based upon that program.

(e) Submitted to the commission a minimum of two rigorous performance evaluations, one in each of the applicant’s two most recent years of service as an administrator, upon which the applicant received ratings of satisfactory or better.

(f) Successfully served as a public school administrator for at least three years or successfully completed an individual program of professional development that included intensive mentoring, assistance, and support as certified by the employing school district.

(g) Submitted fingerprint cards and met the requirements of California for teacher fitness pursuant to Sections 44339, 44340, and 44341.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 703, Sec. 4.   Effective September 27, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

44270.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter and as an expedited alternative to Section 44270, the commission may issue a preliminary services credential with a specialization in administrative services to a candidate who completes the following requirements:

(1) Possess a teaching or services credential as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44270.

(2) Completes the experience requirement specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 44270.

(3) Successfully passes a test adopted by the commission, upon a finding by the commission that the test is aligned to state administrator preparation standards.

(b) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter and as an alternative to Section 44270.1, the commission may issue a professional clear services credential with a specialization in administrative services to a candidate who holds or is eligible for a preliminary services credential with a specialization in administrative services, and who meets one of the following requirements:

(1) Successfully completes a program that is accredited by the commission for the professional clear services credential with a specialization in administrative services and receives a recommendation for the credential from the program.

(2) Demonstrates mastery of commission accredited fieldwork performance standards for a professional clear services credential with a specialization in administrative services, and receives a recommendation for the professional clear services credential with a specialization in administrative services from a commission accredited program. The fieldwork performance standards required pursuant to this paragraph shall be as rigorous as all other fieldwork performance standards required by the commission to obtain a professional clear services credential with a specialization in administrative services.

(3) Passes a national administrator performance assessment adopted by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 225, Sec. 2.   Effective August 16, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

44270.6.

(a) No later than September 1, 2028, the commission shall ensure that the program standards for the professional preparation of candidates for a preliminary services credential with a specialization in administrative services established pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 44270
 include preparation on how to support teachers in delivering instruction through effective means for teaching literacy, aligned to all of the following:

(1) The English Language Arts/English Language Development (ELA/ELD) Framework, including instruction to meet the varied language development needs of English learners.

(2) Evidence-based means of teaching foundational reading skills, which shall include explicit and systematic instruction in print concepts, phonological awareness, phonics and word recognition, and fluency to all pupils, and attending to oral
 and written language development, vocabulary and background knowledge, and comprehension, including tiered supports for pupils with reading difficulties, English learners, and pupils with exceptional needs.

(3) The program guidelines for dyslexia developed pursuant to Section 56335.

(b) The commission shall confirm that administrative preparation programs implement the standards pursuant to this section.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that candidates for a preliminary services credential with a specialization in administrative services are prepared to support teachers to deliver instruction through effective means for teaching literacy in programs in which English learner pupils are being instructed in their primary languages.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 471, Sec. 2.   (AB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44271.

The designated subjects teaching credential with a specialization in vocational trade and technical teaching shall authorize the holder, who also meets the requirements for administrative service, to supervise and administer programs of trade and technical education in school districts or in schools where the curricula are predominately trade, technical, or industrial in nature.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44272.

The commission may issue limited services credentials authorizing administrative service in schools which are not part of the public school system but which are administered by other state agencies.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44273.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this code, any credential described in Section 44250 shall be issued to an applicant under the following circumstances:

(a) The commission has accepted, upon application of an approved institution supported by detailed data and justification, a program developed and offered by that institution as an experimental, exploratory, or pilot program of preparation for such a credential. The commission shall accept only those programs that it finds, by resolution entered in its minutes, to have merit and the potential of improving the quality of service authorized by the credential.

(b) The applicant has completed such a program following the date of
 its acceptance by the commission.

(c) The applicant holds upon completion of the credential program a baccalaureate or higher degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education.

(d) The applicant meets all of the requirements of this chapter and the regulations of the commission adopted pursuant thereto, respecting age, character, citizenship, health, identification, oath or affirmation, and study of or examination in the Constitution of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 663, Sec. 18.   (AB 320)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44274.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, the commission shall issue a five-year preliminary multiple subject teaching credential authorizing instruction in a self-contained classroom, a five-year preliminary single subject teaching credential authorizing instruction in departmentalized classes, or a five-year preliminary education specialist credential authorizing instruction of special education pupils to an out-of-state prepared teacher who meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Possesses a baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education.

(2) Has completed a teacher preparation program at a regionally accredited institution of higher education or a
 state-approved teacher preparation program offered by a local educational agency.
